bg-BG: Схема на монтажните отвори за регистрационен номер на превозно средство: По поръчка/нестандартен; Стандарт за ЕС (2 отвора); Без отвори; Стандарт за Обединеното кралство (2 отвора); САЩ/Канада 2 отвора (отдолу); САЩ/Канада 2 отвора (отгоре); САЩ/Канада 4 отвора; Друго
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisterikilven asennusreikäkuvio: Mukautettu / ei-standardi; EU-standardi (2-reikäinen); Ei reikiä; Britannian standardi (2-reikäinen); Yhdysvallat/Kanada 2-reikäinen (alareuna); Yhdysvallat/Kanada 2-reikäinen (yläreuna); Yhdysvallat/Kanada 4-reikäinen; Muu
sl-SI: Vzorec montažnih lukenj za registrsko tablico vozila: Po meri/nestandardno; EU standard (2 luknji); Brez lukenj; UK standard (2 luknji); ZDA/Kanada – 2 luknji (spodaj); ZDA/Kanada – 2 luknji (zgoraj); ZDA/Kanada – 4 luknje; Drugo
tr: Araç plaka montaj delik deseni: Özel/Standart dışı; AB standart (2 delikli); Deliksiz; Birleşik Krallık standart (2 delikli); ABD/Kanada 2 delikli (alt); ABD/Kanada 2 delikli (üst); ABD/Kanada 4 delikli; Diğer
ja: 車両ライセンスプレートマウント穴パターン: カスタム/非標準; EU 規格 (2 穴); 穴なし; UK 規格 (2 穴); 米国/カナダ 2 穴 (下部); 米国/カナダ 2 穴 (上部); 米国/カナダ 4 穴; その他
nb: Monterinshullmønster for nummerskilt til kjøretøy: Tilpasset / ikke-standard; EU-standard (2-hulls); Ingen hull; Storbritannia-standard (2-hulls); USA/Canada 2-hulls (nederst); USA/Canada 2-hulls (øverst); USA/Canada 4-hulls; Annet
es: Patrón de orificios de la placa de identificación del vehículo: Personalizado/no estándar; Estándar de la UE (2 orificios); Sin orificios; Estándar del Reino Unido (2 orificios); 2 orificios para EE. UU./Canadá (inferior); 2 orificios para EE. UU./Canadá (superior); 4 orificios para EE. UU./Canadá; Otro
nl: Gatenpatroon kentekenplaatmontage: Aangepast/niet-standaard; EU-standaard (2 gaten); Geen gaten; VK-standaard (2 gaten); VS/Canada 2 gaten (onderkant); VS/Canada 2 gaten (bovenkant); VS/Canada 4 gaten; Overig
pt-PT: Disposição dos orifícios de fixação da placa de matrícula do veículo: Personalizado/não padrão; Padrão da UE (2 furos); Sem furos; Padrão do Reino Unido (2 furos); 2 furos EUA/Canadá (inferior); 2 furos EUA/Canadá (superior); 4 furos EUA/Canadá; Outro
hr-HR: Raspored rupa za montažu registarske pločice: Prilagođeno / Nestandardno; Standard EU-a (s 2 rupe); Bez rupa; Standard Ujedinjenog Kraljevstva (s 2 rupe); SAD/Kanada, 2 rupe (dno); SAD/Kanada, 2 rupe (vrh); SAD/Kanada, 4 rupe; Ostalo
fr: Disposition des trous de fixation de la plaque d'immatriculation: Personnalisée/non standard; Standard européen (2 trous); Aucun trou; Standard britannique (2 trous); États-Unis/Canada à 2 trous (en bas); États-Unis/Canada à 2 trous (en haut); États-Unis/Canada à 4 trous; Autre
ru: Шаблон отверстий крепления номерного знака: Пользовательский/нестандартный; Стандарт ЕС (2 отверстия); Без отверстий; Стандарт Великобритании (2 отверстия); США/Канада, 2 отверстия (снизу); США/Канада, 2 отверстия (сверху); США/Канада, 4 отверстия; Другое
zh-CN: 车牌安装孔位布局: 定制/非标准; 欧盟标准 (2 孔); 无孔; 英国标准 (2 孔); 美国/加拿大 2 孔 (底部); 美国/加拿大 2 孔 (顶部); 美国/加拿大 4 孔; 其他
de: Muster der Befestigungslöcher des Fahrzeugkennzeichens: Benutzerdefiniert/Nicht standardmäßig; EU-Standard (2-Loch); Keine Löcher; UK-Standard (2-Loch); USA/Kanada 2-Loch (unten); USA/Kanada 2-Loch (oben); USA/Kanada 4-Loch; Sonstiges
pl: Układ otworów montażowych tablicy rejestracyjnej pojazdu: Niestandardowy/indywidualny; Standard UE (2 otwory); Brak otworów; Standard brytyjski (2 otwory); USA/Kanada 2 otwory (dół); USA/Kanada 2 otwory (góra); USA/Kanada 4 otwory; Inne
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numerio montavimo skylių raštas: Pasirinktinis / nestandartinis; ES standartas (2 skylės); Be skylių; JK standartas (2 skylės); JAV / Kanada, 2 skylės (apačioje); JAV / Kanada, 2 skylės (viršuje); JAV / Kanada, 4 skylės; Kita
sk-SK: Vzor otvorov pre tabuľku s evidenčným číslom vozidla: Vlastné/neštandardné; Štandard EÚ (2 otvory); Bez otvorov; Štandard Spojeného kráľovstva (2 otvory); USA/Kanada 2 otvory (spodné); USA/Kanada 2 otvory (horné); USA/Kanada 4 otvory; Iné
ko: 차량 번호판 장착 구멍 패턴: 맞춤형/비표준; EU 표준(2홀); 구멍 없음; 영국 표준(2홀); 미국/캐나다 2홀(하단); 미국/캐나다 2홀(상단); 미국/캐나다 4홀; 기타
da: Monteringshulmønster for nummerplade: Brugerdefineret/ikke-standard; EU-standard (2 huller); Ingen huller; Britisk standard (2 huller); USA/Canada 2 huller (bund); USA/Canada 2 huller (top); USA/Canada 4 huller; Andet
vi: Kiểu sơ đồ lỗ lắp biển số xe: Tùy chỉnh/Không tiêu chuẩn; Tiêu chuẩn EU (2 lỗ); Không có lỗ; Tiêu chuẩn Anh (2 lỗ); Mỹ/Canada 2 lỗ (dưới); Mỹ/Canada 2 lỗ (trên); Mỹ/Canada 4 lỗ; Khác
zh-TW: 車牌安裝孔樣式: 自訂/非標準; 歐盟標準 (雙孔); 無孔; 英國標準 (雙孔); 美加標準 2 孔 (底部); 美加標準 2 孔 (頂部); 美加標準四孔; 其他
pt-BR: Padrão dos orifícios de fixação da placa de licença do veículo: Personalizado/Não padrão; Padrão da UE (2 furos); Sem furos; Padrão do Reino Unido (2 furos); EUA/Canadá 2 furos (inferior); EUA/Canadá 2 furos (superior); EUA/Canadá 4 furos; Outro
sv: Hålmönster för montering av registreringsskylt: Anpassad/ej standard; EU-standard (2 hål); Inga hål; Brittisk standard (2 hål); USA/Kanada 2 hål (nederkant); USA/Kanada 2 hål (överkant); USA/Kanada 4 hål; Övrigt
el: Διάταξη οπών στερέωσης πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Προσαρμοσμένο/Μη τυπικό; Πρότυπο ΕΕ (2 οπών); Χωρίς οπές; Πρότυπο ΗΒ (2 οπών); ΗΠΑ/Καναδά 2 οπών (κάτω); ΗΠΑ/Καναδά 2 οπών (επάνω); ΗΠΑ/Καναδά 4 οπών; Άλλο
en: Vehicle license plate mounting hole pattern: Custom/Non-standard; EU standard (2-hole); No holes; UK standard (2-hole); US/Canada 2-hole (bottom); US/Canada 2-hole (top); US/Canada 4-hole; Other
hu: Jármű rendszámtábla rögzítő furatkiosztása: Egyedi / Nem szabványos; EU szabvány (2 furatos); Nincsenek furatok; Egyesült Királyság-beli szabvány (2 furatos); USA / Kanada 2 furatos (alsó); USA / Kanada 2 furatos (felső); USA / Kanada 4 furatos; Egyéb
ro-RO: Model al găurilor de prindere pentru plăcuța de înmatriculare auto: Personalizat/non-standard; Standard UE (cu 2 găuri); Fără găuri; Standard UK (cu 2 găuri); SUA/Canada, 2 găuri (partea de jos); SUA/Canada, 2 găuri (partea de sus); SUA/Canada, 4 găuri; Altele
cs: Vzor montážních otvorů SPZ vozidla: Vlastní/nestandardní; Standard EU (2dírový); Bez děr; Standard UK (2dírový); USA/Kanada 2dírový (dole); USA/Kanada 2dírový (nahoře); USA/Kanada 4dírový; Jiné
th: รูปแบบรูยึดป้ายทะเบียนรถ: กำหนดเอง/ไม่ตามมาตรฐาน; มาตรฐาน EU (2 รู); ไม่มีรู; มาตรฐาน UK (2 รู); สหรัฐอเมริกา/แคนาดา 2 รู (ด้านล่าง); สหรัฐอเมริกา/แคนาดา 2 รู (ด้านบน); สหรัฐอเมริกา/แคนาดา 4 รู; อื่นๆ
it: Disposizione dei fori di montaggio della targa identificativa del veicolo: Personalizzato/Non standard; Standard UE (2 fori); Senza fori; Standard Regno Unito (2 fori); USA/Canada 2 fori (inferiori); USA/Canada 2 fori (superiori); USA/Canada 4 fori; Altro